Washington statutes.
RCW 17.34.050

Requests or applications for assistance from insurance fund.

Within the meaning of Article VI(B) or VIII(A), a request or application for assistance from the insurance fund may be made by the director of agriculture whenever in his or her judgment the conditions qualifying this state for such assistance exist and it would be in the best interest of this state to make such request.

[ 2011 c 336 s 472; 1969 ex.s. c 130 s 5.]